Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-312.05
Voter registration
record; effective date.

The date that a person's
voter registration record or an update of his or her voter registration record
becomes effective is the date the person presented himself or herself in person
to register, the date the registration application was delivered to the election
commissioner or county clerk, or the date the registration application was
received by the election commissioner or county clerk if the person submitted
the registration application by mail or
pursuant to section 32-304 or 32-308.

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 8.